Nebraska, session 109, LB104.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB104 LB104
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 9 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Family Home Visitation Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Family Home Visitation Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
and
(2) Home visitation program means a voluntary program carried out in
relevant settings, primarily in the homes of families with one or more
children, five years of age or younger, or pregnant persons.
Sec. 3. (1) The department shall only fund a home visitation
program that includes periodic home visits to improve the health, well-
being, and self-sufficiency of parents and their children.
(2) A home visitation program funded by the State of Nebraska shall
provide visits by nurses, social workers, and other early childhood and
health professionals or trained and supervised lay workers.
(3) A home visitation program funded by the State of Nebraska shall
accomplish one or more of the following:
(a) Improve maternal, infant, or child health outcomes including
reducing preterm births;
(b) Promote positive parenting practices;
(c) Build healthy parent and child relationships;
(d) Enhance social and emotional development;
(e) Support cognitive development;
(f) Improve the health and well-being of the family;
(g) Empower families toward economic self-sufficiency;
(h) Reduce child maltreatment and injury; and
(i) Increase school readiness.
Sec. 4. The department shall only fund an evidence-based home
visitation program. An evidenced-based home visitation program:
(1) Is founded on a clear, consistent program model;
(2) Is associated with, or certified by, a national organization, an
institution of higher education, or a national or state public health
-2-

LB104 LB104
2025 2025
institute;
(3) Has comprehensive home visitation standards that ensure high
quality service delivery and continuous quality improvement;
(4) Follows a program manual or design that specifies the purpose,
outcomes, duration, and frequency of service;
(5) Employs well-trained and culturally competent staff;
(6) Provides continual professional development relevant to the
specific program model being delivered;
(7) Demonstrates strong links to other community-based services;
(8) Operates within an organization that ensures compliance with
home visitation standards; and
(9) Operates with fidelity to the program model.
Sec. 5. Home visitation program funds may be used for workforce
purposes and to assist the programs and individuals in receiving and
maintaining certification for home visitation providers.
Sec. 6. The Family Home Visitation Act does not apply to a program
that provides a single home visit or infrequent home visits.
Sec. 7. Families may decline home visitation program services at
any time.
Sec. 8. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Family Home Visitation Act.
Sec. 9. (1) No later than February 15, 2026, and through February
15, 2028, the department shall submit an electronic report to the Clerk
of the Legislature. Such report shall be made available on the
department's website and shall include the following information, if
available:
(a) The type and location of home visitation programs;
(b) The goals and achieved outcomes of home visitation programs;
(c) The number of families served by each home visitation program;
(d) Demographic data on the families served;
(e) The total amount of funds expended for home visitation programs;
-3-

LB104 LB104
2025 2025
(f) Program model descriptions and model-specific outcomes;
(g) The training and professional credentials required for each
program model;
(h) Eligibility criteria for each program model;
(i) Target populations for each program model;
(j) Wait list information, if applicable; and
(k) Referral sources.
(2) The department shall only include outcomes from federally funded
or state-funded home visitation programs.
-4-